test/src/morphology/mrj-test-N-OLMA_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

# todo: 
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


   Noun - олма: # Noun 'an apple/omena'
     олма+N+Sg+Nom: олма
     олма+N+Sg+Gen: олман
     олма+N+Sg+Acc: олмам
     олма+N+Sg+Com: олмаге
     олма+N+Sg+Dat: олмалан
     олма+N+Sg+Ine: олмашты
     олма+N+Sg+Ill: олмашкы
     олма+N+Sg+Lat: олмаэш
     олма+N+Sg+Comp: олмала
     олма+N+Sg+Abe: олмаде
     олма+N+Pl+Nom: олмавлӓ
     олма+N+Pl+Gen: олмавлӓн
     олма+N+Pl+Acc: олмавлӓм
     олма+N+Pl+Com: олмавлӓге
     олма+N+Pl+Dat: олмавлӓлӓн
     олма+N+Pl+Ine: олмавлӓштӹ
     олма+N+Pl+Ill: [олмавлӓшкӹ, олмавлӓш]
     олма+N+Pl+Lat: олмавлӓэш
     олма+N+Pl+Comp: олмавлӓлӓ
     олма+N+Pl+Abe: олмавлӓде
     
     олма+N+PxSg1+Sg+Nom: олмаэм
     олма+N+PxSg1+Sg+Gen: олмаэмӹн
     олма+N+PxSg1+Sg+Acc: олмаэмӹм
     олма+N+PxSg1+Sg+Com: олмаэмге
     олма+N+PxSg1+Sg+Dat: олмаэмлӓн
     олма+N+PxSg1+Sg+Ine: олмаэштем
     олма+N+PxSg1+Sg+Ill: олмаэшкем
     олма+N+PxSg1+Sg+Lat: олмаэшем
     олма+N+PxSg1+Sg+Comp: олмаэмлӓ 
     олма+N+PxSg1+Sg+Abe: олмаэмде 
     олма+N+PxSg1+Pl+Nom: [олмавлӓэм, олмаэмвлӓ]
     олма+N+PxSg1+Pl+Gen: [олмавлӓэмӹн, олмаэмвлӓн]
     олма+N+PxSg1+Pl+Acc: [олмавлӓэмӹм, олмаэмвлӓм]
     олма+N+PxSg1+Pl+Com: [олмавлӓэмге, олмаэмвлӓге]
     олма+N+PxSg1+Pl+Dat: [олмавлӓэмлӓн, олмаэмвлӓлӓн]
     олма+N+PxSg1+Pl+Ine: [олмавлӓштем, олмаэмвлӓштӹ]  
     олма+N+PxSg1+Pl+Ill: [олмавлӓшкем, олмаэмвлӓшкӹ]
     олма+N+PxSg1+Pl+Lat: [олмавлӓэшем, олмаэмвлӓэш]
     олма+N+PxSg1+Pl+Comp: [олмавлӓэмлӓ, олмаэмвлӓлӓ]
     олма+N+PxSg1+Pl+Abe: [олмавлӓэмде, олмаэмвлӓде]
